California statutes. Vehicle Code
 not refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle owned by a renter or lessor if the applicant provides the department with the abstract or notice of disposition of parking violation issued pursuant to subdivision (c) for clearing all outstanding parking penalties and administrative fees as shown by the records of the department.

(c) The court or designated processing agency shall issue an abstract or notice of disposition of parking violation to the renter or lessor of a vehicle issued a notice of delinquent parking violation relating to standing or parking if the renter or lessor provides the court or processing agency with the name, address, and driver’s license number of the rentee or lessee at the time of occurrence of the parking violation.

(d) The department shall not
 refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle if the citation was issued prior to the registered owner taking possession of the vehicle.

(e) The department shall allow a registered owner or lessee to file a certification that the vehicle will not be operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway pursuant to Section 4604, if the registered owner or lessee currently owes parking penalties and administrative fees for that vehicle, regardless of whether or not that registered owner or lessee is currently on an active payment plan pursuant to Section 40220.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 741, Sec. 2.   (AB 503)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4760.1.

(a) The department shall, before renewing the registration of any vehicle, check the driver’s license record of all registered owners for conviction of traffic violations and traffic accidents.

(b) The department shall, before renewing the registration of any vehicle, check the driver’s license record of all registered owners for notices filed with the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of former Section 40509 and notices that the licensee has failed to pay a lawfully imposed fine, penalty, assessment, or bail within the time authorized by the court
 for any violation that is required to be reported pursuant to Section 1803 and shall refuse to renew the registration of the vehicle if the driver’s license record of any registered owner has any such outstanding notices to appear or failures to pay a court-ordered fine, unless the department has received a certificate issued by the magistrate or clerk of the court hearing the case in which the promise was given showing that the case has been adjudicated or unless the registered owner’s record is cleared as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 41500) of Division 17. In lieu of the certificate of adjudication, a notice from the court stating that the original records have been lost or destroyed shall permit the department to renew the registration.

(c) Any notice received by the department pursuant to
 former 
 Section 40509 that has been on file five years may be removed from the department records and destroyed, in the discretion of the department.

(d) In lieu of the certificate of adjudication or a notice from the court, the department shall with the consent of all registered owners collect the amounts that it has been notified are due pursuant to former Section 40509 and former Section 40509.5, and authorized to be collected pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 14910) of Chapter 5 of Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 4.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4761.

The department shall include on each potential registration card issued for use at the time of renewal, or on an accompanying document, an itemization of unpaid parking penalties, including administrative fees, showing the amount thereof and the jurisdiction which issued the notice of parking violation relating thereto, which the registered owner or lessee is required to pay pursuant to Section 4760.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 939, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

4762.

The department shall remit all parking penalties and administrative fees collected, after deducting the administrative fee authorized by Section 4763, for each notice of delinquent parking violation for which parking penalties and administrative fees have been collected pursuant to Section 4760, to each jurisdiction in the amounts due to each jurisdiction according to its unadjudicated notices of delinquent parking violation. Within 45 days from the time penalties are recorded by the department, the department shall inform each jurisdiction which of its notices of delinquent parking violation have been discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 939, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

4763.

(a) The department shall assess a fee for the recording of the notice of delinquent parking violation, which is given to the department by a processing agency pursuant to Section 40220, in an amount, as determined by the department, that is sufficient to provide a total amount equal to its actual costs of administering Sections 4760, 4761, 4762, 4764, and 4765, and administering the system described in Section 4456.2.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 12.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4764.

(a) If a vehicle is transferred or the registration is not renewed for two renewal periods and the former registered owner or lessee of the vehicle owes a parking penalty for a notice of delinquent parking violation filed with the department pursuant to Section 40220, the department shall notify each jurisdiction of that fact and is not required thereafter to attempt collection of the undeposited parking penalty and administrative fees.

(b) This section does not apply if the transfer of a vehicle is one described in Section 6285 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   (AB 443)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4765.

No exemption from the payment of any fee imposed by this code is an exemption from the obligation of a registered owner or lessee to pay the full amount of parking penalties and administrative fees pursuant to Section 4760.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 939, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

4766.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the department shall refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle for which a notice of noncompliance has been transmitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40002.1 if no certificate of adjudication has been received by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section. The department shall include on each potential registration card issued for use at the time of renewal, or on an accompanying document, an itemization of citations for which notices of noncompliance have been received by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40002.1. The itemization shall include the citation number, citation date, and the jurisdiction that issued the underlying notice pursuant to Section 40002 and the administrative service fee for clearing the offense pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section.

(b) Upon application for renewal of vehicle registration for a vehicle subject to subdivision (a), the department shall not refuse registration renewal pursuant to subdivision (a) if the applicant, with respect to each outstanding certificate of noncompliance, has performed both of the following:

(1) Provides the department with a certificate of adjudication for the offense issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40002.1.

(2) Pays an administrative service fee, which shall be established by the department to, in the aggregate, defray its costs in administering this section.

(c) Whenever registration of a vehicle subject to subdivision (a) is transferred or not renewed for two renewal periods, the department shall notify each court that transmitted a notice of noncompliance affecting the vehicle of the transfer of, or lack of renewal of, the registration and the department shall not thereafter refuse registration renewal pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 215.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4767.

(a) If delinquent parking or toll violations have been reported to the department for a vehicle for which a transfer of ownership and registration has been requested, the department shall not transfer ownership and registration unless the transferee requesting the transfer pays all of the fines and penalties for those violations to the department, or provides an original abstract or notice of disposition from the court or designated processing agency that the fines and penalties for those violations have been cleared with the parking agency or the court.

(b) This section only applies if the transfer requested is one described in Section 6285 of the Revenue and Taxation
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 101, Sec. 2.   (AB 443)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Refusal of Registration for Nonpayment of Toll Evasion Penalties [4770. - 4775.]

4770.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) or (d), the department shall refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle if the registered owner or lessee has been mailed a notice of toll evasion violation, the processing agency has transmitted to the department an itemization of unpaid toll evasion penalties, including administrative fees, pursuant to Section 40267, and the toll evasion penalty and administrative fee have not been paid pursuant to Section 40266, unless the full amount of all outstanding toll evasion penalties and administrative fees, as shown by records of the department are paid to the department at the time of application for renewal.

(b) The designated processing agency shall issue a notice of the disposition of the toll evasion violation or violations to a lessor, if the lessor provides the processing agency with the name, address, and driver’s license number of the lessee at the time of the occurrence of the toll evasion violation.

(c) The department shall renew the registration of a vehicle if the applicant provides the department with the notice of the disposition of the toll evasion violation or violations issued pursuant to subdivision (b) for clearing all outstanding toll evasion penalties and administrative fees, as shown by the records of the department, and the applicant has met all other requirements for registration.

(d) The department shall not refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle if the toll evasion violation occurred prior to the date that the registered owner or lessee took possession of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 741, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4771.

The department shall include on each vehicle registration renewal notice issued for use at the time of renewal, or on an accompanying document, an itemization of unpaid toll evasion penalties, including administrative fees, showing the amount thereof, the jurisdiction that issued the notice of toll evasion violation, and the date of toll evasion relating thereto, which the registered owner or lessee is required to pay pursuant to Section 4770.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4772.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department shall remit all toll evasion penalties and administrative fees collected, after deducting the administrative fee authorized by Section 4773, for each notice of delinquent toll evasion violation for which toll evasion penalties and administrative fees have been collected pursuant to Section 4770, to each jurisdiction in the amounts due to each jurisdiction according to its unadjudicated notices of delinquent toll violation. Within 45 days from the time penalties are paid to the department, the department shall inform each jurisdiction which of its notices of delinquent toll evasion violation have been collected.

(b) This subdivision applies to facilities developed pursuant to Section 143 of the Streets and Highways Code. For each notice of delinquent toll evasion violation for which toll evasion penalties and administrative fees have been collected by the department pursuant to Section 4770, each issuing agency is due an amount equal to the sum of the unpaid toll, administrative fees, other costs incurred by the issuing agency that are related to toll evasion, process service fees, and fees and collection costs related to civil debt collection. After deducting the department’s administrative fee authorized by Section 4773 and the amounts due each issuing agency for unpaid tolls, administrative fees, other costs incurred by the issuing agency that are related to toll evasion, process service fees, and fees and collection costs related to civil debt collection, the department shall deposit the balance of the toll evasion penalties collected pursuant to Section 4770, if any, in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4773.

(a) The department shall assess a fee for the recording of the notice of delinquent toll evasion violation, which is given to the department by a processing agency pursuant to Section 40267, in an amount, as determined by the department, that is sufficient to provide a total amount equal to at least its actual costs of administering Sections 4770, 4771, 4774, and 4775, and administering the system described in Section 4456.2.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 14.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4773.5.

(a) The department shall require the entire cost of initially implementing this article to be reimbursed by the issuing agencies that are private entities and by the local authorities described in Section 40250, on whose behalf toll processing procedures are carried out pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 40250) of Chapter 1 of Division 17. For purposes of this section, the cost to the department of initially implementing this article includes all of the one-time costs that are incurred by the department in order to implement this article, but does not include ongoing administrative costs associated with this article. The issuing agencies and the local authorities shall each be required to reimburse the department for 50 percent of the reimbursable costs.

(b) (1) The amount collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be the actual cost.

(2) The amount of the reimbursement required by subdivision (a) for each issuing agency and local authority shall be determined by the department in as equitable a manner as possible. In the event of a dispute of the reimbursement required by subdivision (a), an issuing agency may request an audit of applicable costs by a certified public accountant or public accountant. The cost of the audit shall be borne by the issuing agency requesting the audit. The result of the audit shall determine the actual costs.

(c) The processing agency shall access the department’s data base via “on-line” techniques or other methods as the department and the processing agency may agree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4774.

(a) If a vehicle is transferred or the registration is not renewed for two renewal periods and the former registered owner or lessee of the vehicle owes a toll evasion penalty for a notice of delinquent toll evasion violation filed with the department pursuant to Section 40267, the department shall notify each jurisdiction of that fact and is not required thereafter to attempt collection of the undeposited toll evasion penalty and administrative fees.

(b) This section does not apply if the transfer of a vehicle is one described in Section 6285 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 101, Sec. 3.   (AB 443)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4775.

No exemption from the payment of any fee imposed by this code is an exemption from the obligation of a registered owner or lessee to pay the full amount of toll evasion penalties and administrative fees pursuant to Section 4770.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. License Plates [4850. - 4854.]

4850.

(a) The department, upon registering a vehicle, shall issue to the owner two partially or fully reflectorized license plates or devices for a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, and one partially or fully reflectorized license plate or device for all other vehicles required to be registered under this code. The plates or devices shall identify the vehicles for which they are issued for the period of their validity.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no contract shall be let to any nongovernmental entity for the purchase or securing of reflectorized material for the plates, unless the department has made every reasonable effort to secure qualified bids from as many independent, responsible bidders as possible. No contract shall be let to any nongovernmental entity for the manufacturing of reflectorized safety license plates.

(c) In addition to any other fees specified in this code, a fee of one dollar ($1) for reflectorization shall be paid only by those vehicle owners receiving license plates or devices under this section.

(d) This section does not require vehicle owners with nonreflectorized license plates or devices to replace them with reflectorized plates or devices.

(e) This section shall be known as the Schrade-Belotti Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 679.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 4850 and Section 5200, the department, upon registering a truck tractor, shall issue to the owner one suitable license plate or other device which identifies the vehicle for which it is issued and for the period of its validity. The license plate or other device shall be attached to the front of the vehicle.

(b) This section shall become operative only when and if the Department of the California Highway Patrol implements a program which requires identifying numbers on the right and left sides of truck tractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4851.

Every license plate shall have displayed upon it the registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it is issued, together with the word “California” or the abbreviation “Cal.” and the year number for which it is issued or a suitable device issued by the department for validation purposes, which device shall contain the year number for which issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.

(a) License plates issued for motor vehicles, other than motorcycles, shall be rectangular in shape, 12 inches in length and six inches in width. The number and letter characters on the plates shall have a minimum height of two and three-quarter inches, a minimum width of one and one-quarter inches, and a minimum spacing between characters of five-sixteenths of an inch.

(b) Motorcycle license plates shall measure seven inches in length and four inches in width, and the characters on the plates shall have a minimum height of one and one-half inches and a minimum width of nine-sixteenths inches, and shall have a minimum spacing between characters of three-sixteenths of an inch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 859, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.

(a) The department may issue one or more stickers, tabs, or other suitable devices in lieu of the license plates provided for under this code. Except when the physical differences between the stickers, tabs, or devices and license plates by their nature render the provisions of this code inapplicable, all provisions of this code relating to license plates may apply to stickers, tabs, or devices.

(b) The department may establish a pilot program to evaluate the use of alternatives to the stickers, tabs, license plates, and registration cards authorized by this code, subject to all of the following
 requirements:

(1) The alternative products shall be approved by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(2) The pilot program shall be limited to no more than 0.5 percent of registered vehicles for the purpose of road testing and evaluation.

(3) The alternative products to be evaluated shall be provided at no cost to the state.

(4) Any pilot program established by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to vehicle owners who have voluntarily chosen to participate in the pilot program.

(c) In the conduct of any pilot program
 pursuant to this section, any data exchanged between the department and any electronic device or the provider of any electronic device shall be limited to those data necessary to display evidence of registration compliance. The department shall not receive or retain any information generated during the pilot program regarding the movement, location, or use of a vehicle participating in the pilot program.

(d) In the conduct of any pilot program pursuant to this section, the department may evaluate the inclusion of participants in the Business Partner Automation Program, pursuant to Section 1685.

(e) Subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, shall become inoperative on the effective date of any regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 4854.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 746, Sec. 2.   (AB 984)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.

(a) The department shall establish a program authorizing an entity to issue devices as alternatives to the conventional license plates, stickers, tabs, and registration cards authorized by this code, subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) The alternative device is subject to the approval of the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol and shall not be used in lieu of a device issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles until that approval has been granted.

(2) (A) Except as specifically authorized in subparagraph (B), an alternative device shall not include vehicle location
 technology.

(B) (1) (i) Vehicle location technology may be offered for vehicles registered as fleet vehicles, pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 5301), commercial vehicles, as defined in Section 260, and those operating under an occupational license, pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100).

(ii) Vehicles that began using an alternative device that included vehicle location technology during an authorized pilot program established by Section 4853 may continue to use that alternative device if the vehicle location technology meets the requirements set forth in this section and applicable regulations.

(iii) Beginning on January 1, 2027, and thereafter, any
 vehicle may be offered an alternative device that includes vehicle location technology.

(2) An alternative device that includes vehicle location technology shall comply with all of the following:

(i) The vehicle location technology shall be capable of being permanently disabled by means of a nonreversible method that ceases all vehicle location functionality and tracking information capabilities.

(ii) The vehicle location technology shall be capable of being manually disabled and enabled by a driver of the vehicle who is inside the vehicle.

(iii) The method of manually disabling and enabling the vehicle location technology shall be prominently
 located inside the vehicle and easy to use, and shall not require access to a remote or online application, password, or any form of log-in information.

(iv) Once a driver has manually disabled the vehicle location technology from inside the vehicle, the only method of enabling the vehicle location technology shall be to manually enable the technology from inside the vehicle. The registered owner of the license plate, the vehicle manufacturer, the department, or any other entity shall not have the capability of enabling the vehicle location technology through remote means.

(3) If an alternative device is equipped with vehicle location technology, the alternative device shall display a visual indication when the vehicle location technology is in active use.

(4) Data exchanged between the department and the alternative device, or the provider of the alternative device, is limited to that data necessary to display evidence of registration compliance, including the payment of registration fees, plate configurations, and the information or images displayed on the alternative product. If the department receives data from an alternative device or the provider of an alternative device in violation of this paragraph, the department shall immediately delete that data.

(5) Use of an alternative device is optional, and users shall affirmatively opt in to using the alternative device instead of a conventional license plate, sticker, tab, or registration card.

(b) (1) The department shall adopt regulations to carry out this program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Determining standards necessary for the safe use of alternative products.

(B) Requirements for product oversight and consumer support.

(C) Requirements for product size, design, display, and functionality.

(D) Introduction of new products through a pilot program.

(E) Transitioning pilot products, and approved enhancements to existing alternative products, to a statewide product offering.

(F) Approval of
 products for statewide use.

(G) Determining data sharing, privacy, and security protocols pursuant to Section 1 of Article I of the California Constitution’s right to privacy and other applicable privacy laws.

(H) Processes for revoking an alternative product’s authority for use.

(I) Testing enhancements to approved alternative products.

(J) Determining the types of plates eligible to participate and associated approval processes.

(K) Establishing reasonable fees to reimburse the department for the costs to implement the program.

(L) Reporting requirements.

(M) Requirements to ensure registered users of a device are aware of GPS capability and usage and can deactivate the function.

(N) Requirements to ensure nonregistered vehicle operators are aware of GPS capability and usage. This may include, but is not limited to, live notifications of the GPS function, toll-free communication with the device provider for vehicle location function status and deactivation, or visual indicators of GPS capability or usage.

(2) In developing these regulations, the department may consult with the Department of the California Highway Patrol and shall conduct hearings with the opportunity for public comment on the adoption of any regulation applicable to
 alternative registration products.

(3) In developing these regulations, the department may specify timeframes for compliance and temporary operating authority for products piloted under Section 4853 that are submitted for approval under this section.

(4) An entity seeking approval to issue an alternative device or electronic vehicle registration card for pilot or statewide use under this section shall submit a business plan for the device to the department for approval that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An administrative oversight plan.

(B) A product support plan, including, but not limited to, methods of providing
 proof of registration that are not subject to technological failures to be used in the event of the alternative device malfunctioning or failing.

(C) Information technology security, privacy, and cybersecurity evaluations and measures to protect against unauthorized access to information and the device.

(D) Procedures to comply with applicable privacy and security requirements, including, but not limited to, the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code). For purposes of this section, a provider of the device shall not share or sell the information obtained to provide the device, or any other information obtained by virtue of contracting with the department to provide the device, including, but
 not limited to, information collected by the device itself, nor shall it use the information for any purpose other than as strictly necessary to provide the device and show proof of vehicle registration.

(E) Ensuring that the information transmitted between the alternative device or electronic vehicle registration card, the department, and the provider, as well as any mobile application required for the alternative device or electronic vehicle registration card, including storage, is encrypted and protected to the highest reasonable security standards broadly available.

(5) An alternative device intended to serve in lieu of a license plate shall be subject to all of the following requirements:

(A) Have a minimum effective
 viewable area that meets the size specifications of Section 4852.

(B) Provide legibility and visibility according to standards consistent with those applied to standard metal reflectorized license plates, as set forth in this article.

(C) Be displayed in a manner consistent with Article 9 (commencing with Section 5200).

(D) Display only information and images approved by the department or deemed necessary by the department.

(E) Be readable by automated license plate readers used by the Department of the California Highway Patrol and any other automated enforcement system.

(F) Be readable by
 the human eye during hours of both daylight and darkness at a distance of no less than 75 feet.

(G) The alphanumeric characters assigned to the vehicle by the department and evidence of valid registration are capable of and shall be displayed on the device whenever a vehicle is in motion, stationary, parked on or off of a road or highway, or unoccupied.

(6) An alternative device intended to serve in lieu of a registration card is subject to both of the following requirements:

(A) Meets the requirements of Section 4453.

(B) May be used to comply with Section 4462.

(7) An alternative device intended to serve in lieu
 of a license plate or a registration card shall not record or transmit personal identifiable information and shall only record or transmit data limited to what is necessary to display evidence of registration compliance.

(8) The department may establish additional requirements it deems necessary to implement this subdivision.

(9) The department may authorize an alternative device to replicate the appearance of a license plate approved pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Section 5007.

(B) Article 8.4 (commencing with Section 5060).

(C) Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 5100).

(D) Article 8.6 (commencing with Section 5151).

(c) An alternative device failure or malfunction may be deemed a correctable violation if all of the provisions of Section 40610 are met.

(d) The provider of the device, if the device has digital capabilities, shall build into the device a process for frequent notification if the device becomes defective. The provider of the device shall seek to replace defective devices as soon as possible.

(e) Alternative devices issued pursuant to this section may emit diffused nonglaring light only to the extent necessary to meet the visibility requirements of Sections 5201 and 24601.

(f) (1) An employer, or a person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not use an alternative device to monitor employees except during work hours, and only if strictly necessary for the performance of the employee’s duties. For purposes of this section, “monitor” includes, but is not limited to, locating, tracking, watching, listening to, or otherwise surveilling the employee.

(2) An employer, or a person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against an employee for removing or disabling an alternative device’s monitoring capabilities, including vehicle location technology, outside of work hours. An employee who believes they have been subject to a violation of this paragraph may file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 98.7 of the Labor Code. In addition to the civil
 penalties described in this provision, an employee retaliated against in violation of this section shall be entitled to all available penalties,
 remedies, and compensation, including, but not limited to, reinstatement and reimbursement of lost wages, work benefits, or other compensation caused by the retaliation.

(3) An employer or a person acting on behalf of the employer shall provide an employee with a notice stating that monitoring will occur before conducting any monitoring with an alternative device. The notice shall include, at a minimum, all of the following elements:

(A) A description of the specific activities that will be monitored.

(B) A description of the worker data that will be collected as a part of the monitoring.

(C) A notification of whether the data gathered
 through monitoring will be used to make or inform any employment-related decisions, including, but not limited to, disciplinary and termination decisions, and, if so, how, including any associated benchmarks.

(D) A description of the vendors or other third parties, if any, to which information collected through monitoring will be disclosed or transferred. The description shall include the name of the vendor or third party and the purpose for the data transfer.

(E) A description of the organizational positions that are authorized to access the data gathered through the alternative device.

(F) A description of the dates, times, and frequency that the monitoring will occur.

(G) A description of where the data will be stored and the length of time it will be retained.

(H) A notification of the employee’s right to disable monitoring, including vehicle location technology, outside of work hours.

(4) (A) An employer who violates this subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for an initial violation and one thousand dollars ($1,000) per employee for each subsequent violation.

(B) For purposes of determining the penalty described in subparagraph (A), the penalty shall be assessed per employee, per violation, and per day that monitoring without proper notice is conducted.

(C) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section using the procedures set forth in Section 1197.1 of the Labor Code, as applicable, including through the issuance of citations against employers who violate this section. The procedures for issuing and contesting citations, and enforcing judgments for civil penalties, that are issued by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be the same as those set forth in Section 1197.1 of the Labor Code.

(D) An employer, and any third-party vendor that contracts with an employer to provide GPS tracking of vehicles through an alternative device as described in this section, upon request, shall furnish any report or information that the Labor Commissioner or the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement requires to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 756, Sec. 2.   (AB 3138)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Special Plates [5000. - 5024.]

5000.

(a) Identification plates issued for trailers, semitrailers, motor-driven cycles, and pole and pipe dollies, and such vehicles as are exempt from the payment of registration fees under this code shall display suitable distinguishing marks or symbols, and the registration numbers assigned to each class of vehicles shall run in a separate numerical series, except that registration numbers assigned to vehicles exempt from the payment of registration fees may run in several separate numerical series.

(b) Vehicles subject to Sections 9400 and 9400.1 shall be issued license plates with suitable distinguishing marks or symbols distinguishing them from other license plates issued.

(c) Vehicles subject to Section 5014.1 shall be issued permanent identification plates with suitable distinguishing marks or symbols that distinguish them from other license plates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 21.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

The department may issue license plates for vehicles exempt from registration fees in the same series as plates issued for nonexempt vehicles. The plates may be issued for a one-year period and only upon the certification of the department that the issuance of the plates has been requested by the head of a criminal justice or a law enforcement agency of a city, county, or state or federal department, that the vehicle is assigned to persons responsible for investigating actual or suspected violations of the law or the supervision of persons liberated from a state prison or other institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections by parole or the supervision of persons liberated from an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority by parole, and is intended for use in the line of duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 576, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.5.

The director may enter into agreements or arrangements with motor vehicle departments in other states to provide for a reciprocal exchange of regular series license plates for the purposes of and under the conditions provided in Sections 5001 and 5003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 576, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

The department may issue regular series plates to the Department of General Services for use on motor vehicles maintained within motor vehicle pools of state-owned vehicles when the vehicles are used for the purposes set forth in Section 5001, except that the Department of General Services shall not assign, dispatch, or otherwise make any of those vehicles available for use by any agency of the state except upon the certification of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 576, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.5.

The department shall issue regular series license plates for any motor vehicle owned by, or in the possession and use of, the Senate or Assembly, upon the request of the Rules Committee thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.6.
